Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,163
Hand and arm signals; how given.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all hand and arm signals required by the Nebraska Rules of the Road shall be given from the left side of the vehicle with the left arm in the following manner and such signals shall indicate as follows:

(a) Left turn—hand and arm extended to the left horizontally;

(b) Right turn—hand and forearm extended upward; and

(c) Stop or decrease speed—hand and arm extended downward.

(2) Any person operating a bicycle may signal a right turn by fully extending the right arm and pointing.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 54;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-654;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 259;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 9.